Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Chapter 90. General Provisions.

Sec. 23.90.900.
Definitions.

In this title,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of labor and workforce development;

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“wages” means, except for the purposes of construing AS 23.20 and AS 23.30

the basic hourly rate of pay; and

all other compensation to an employee for services performed, including revocable and irrevocable contributions made by an employer to a trustee or third party for the benefit of the employee and contributions which may be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to employees under an enforceable agreement to provide medical care, compensation for death or injury, or other fringe benefits.

History.

(am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999. Former AS

23.45.010

; renumbered in 2008.